Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.280

Directors, officers, and employees—Duties, responsibilities and restrictions—Removal.

The directors or other governing body of an alien bank and the officers and employees of its office in this state shall be subject to all of the duties, responsibilities and restrictions to which the directors, officers and employees of a bank organized under the laws of this state are subject insofar as such duties, responsibilities and restrictions are not inconsistent with the intent of this chapter. An officer or employee of the office of an alien bank doing business in this state pursuant to this chapter may be removed for the reasons stated and in the manner provided in RCW 30A.12.040.

[ 2014 c 37 s 220; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28. Formerly RCW 30.42.280.]